Arkansas, session 2025, SB251.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 22-4-404(c), concerning the Arkansas Trails
Council, is amended to read as follows:
(c) The Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism's Tourism shall
designate a representative to serve on the council shall serve as the
council's executive secretary.





*JLL163*
02/18/2025 8:25:10 AM JLL163